District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.126

Repealed

Proclaimed corporations — Reservation of name.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 232, ch. 269, § 126
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.126.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.27.
1973 Ed., § 29-938c.